California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
If, as of December 31, 2022, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the City of Santa Fe Springs as required by subdivision (b) of Section 7286.27, this chapter shall be repealed as of that same date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 651, Sec. 1.   (SB 703)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed conditionally on December 31, 2022, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 2.66, commencing with Section 7286.27.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.7. San Diego County Justice Facilities Financing Act [7286.30. - 7286.38.]

7286.30.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that in the County of San Diego justice-related facilities are so inadequate as to significantly impede the administration of justice, that jail and court facilities are so overcrowded as to create a situation wherein persons who are a danger to society are required to be released into that society for lack of adequate facilities to house and prosecute them, and that law enforcement and crime prevention are so inadequately funded as to endanger the safety of persons and property in San Diego County. The Legislature
 further finds and declares that it is in the public interest to allow the voters to approve a special tax so that justice-related facility needs and law enforcement and crime prevention needs may be addressed in an expeditious and appropriate fashion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 415, Sec. 1.   Effective August 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

7286.31.

(a) The board of supervisors of the County of San Diego, subject to the approval of the voters, may impose a tax rate of one-half of 1 percent under this chapter and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2. Neither this chapter nor any ordinance or resolution approved pursuant to this chapter shall affect any tax otherwise authorized.

(b) The combined rate of tax imposed in the County of San Diego by any public entity pursuant to Part 1.5 (commencing with
 Section 7200) or Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2, this chapter, and any other provision of law authorizing the imposition of local sales or transactions and use taxes shall not exceed 2.25 percent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   Effective July 20, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

7286.32.

(a) A retail transactions and use tax ordinance applicable in the incorporated and unincorporated territory of the County of San Diego shall be adopted by the board of supervisors in accordance with Section 7286.31 and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2, if the tax is approved by a two-thirds vote of the qualified voters of the county voting on the measure at a special election called for that purpose by the board. The election called by the board shall be held within the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the
 county. The tax ordinance shall take effect 48 hours subsequent to the closing time of the polls on the day of the election at which the proposition is adopted. The initial collection of the transactions and use tax shall take place in accordance with Section 7286.35.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7286.38 and subdivision (a) of this section, in the event voters approve a constitutional amendment permitting the imposition of a local special tax with the approval of a majority of the voters voting on the measure, the vote requirement for approval of the tax authorized by this act shall be a majority of voters voting on the measure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   Effective July 20, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

7286.33.

The ordinance shall state the tax rate and may state a term during which the tax will be imposed. The ordinance shall state the appropriate requirements for voter approval pursuant to Section 7286.32. The ordinance may authorize the board of supervisors to reduce the tax rate to one-quarter of 1 percent at its discretion, if the board determines that revenue from the reduced rate would be sufficient to fund the justice-related facility obligations incurred in connection with this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 415, Sec. 2.   Effective August 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

7286.34.

The board of supervisors shall have sole discretion to determine the specific activities and projects financed with revenues generated by the tax. However, those activities and projects shall be limited to the provision, construction, and operation of justice-related facilities, the funding of law enforcement and crime prevention projects and activities, the funding of the costs incurred by the county to conduct the election authorized by Section 7286.32, and the cost of any legal actions incurred by the county related to the tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 415, Sec. 3.   Effective August 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

7286.35.

(a) Any transactions and use tax ordinance adopted pursuant to this article shall become operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 110 days after the ordinance takes effect.

(b) Any reduction in the transactions and use tax rate authorized by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 7286.33 shall become operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter beginning 110 days or more after the board’s action authorizing the
 reduction.

(c) Prior to the operative date of the ordinance, the board of supervisors shall contract with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   Effective July 20, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

7286.36.

Any action or proceeding wherein the validity of the adoption of the retail transactions and use tax ordinance provided for in this chapter or the issuance of any bonds thereunder or any of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied, shall be commenced pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Otherwise, the tax, the bonds, and all proceedings in relation thereto, including the adoption and approval of the ordinance, shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal
 and uncontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   Effective July 20, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

7286.37.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   Effective July 20, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

7286.38.

The transactions and use tax authorized under this chapter constitutes a special tax that requires approval of two-thirds of the qualified electors pursuant to Section 4 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   Effective July 20, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.8. Los Angeles County Transactions and Use Tax to Prevent and Combat Homelessness [7286.40. - 7286.40.]

7286.40.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the transactions and use tax proposed to, and approved by, the voters of the County of Los Angeles on the March 7, 2017, ballot as Measure H was valid and authorized under Section 7285.5 and conforms to Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), and continues to be valid and authorized. This subdivision is declarative of, and clarifies, existing law.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall enter into a contract with the County of Los Angeles to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the transactions and use tax ordinance described in subdivision (a) and shall collect the tax in all districts within the county where the aggregate tax is 0.25 percent or more below the limitation specified in Section 7251.1. The contract with the county shall comply with Section 7270, and shall ensure the collection of the tax commences on October 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 92.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.85. Fresno Zoological Tax [7286.43. - 7286.43.]

7286.43.

In addition to any other authority as provided for by law, the Board of Supervisors of the County of Fresno may establish a special purpose authority for the support of zoos, zoological facilities, and related zoological purposes in that county. Any authority that is so established may, by ordinance, impose a tax at a rate of 0.1 percent in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The ordinance
 proposing that tax is approved by two-thirds of the entire membership of the governing board of that authority.

(b) The ordinance proposing that tax is approved by two-thirds of the voters of the county voting on that ordinance.

(c) The ordinance proposing that tax requires all revenues, net of refunds, derived from the tax to be expended exclusively for the support of zoos, zoological facilities, and related zoological purposes within the County of Fresno.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 285, Sec. 1.   Effective September 10, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.87. City of Visalia Transactions and Use Tax [7286.44. - 7286.44.]

7286.44.

(a) Subject to the expenditure restrictions in subdivision (b), the City of Visalia may levy a tax at a rate of 0.25 percent in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) An ordinance proposing that tax is approved by a majority vote of all of the members of the city council.

(2) The proposing ordinance is approved
 by a two-thirds vote of qualified voters of the city voting in an election on the issue.

(b) The net revenues derived from a tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be exclusively expended for public safety, fire, and law enforcement purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 346, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.9. Clearlake Transactions and Use Tax [7286.45. - 7286.45.]

7286.45.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the City of Clearlake may levy a transactions and use tax at a rate of 0.25 or 0.5 percent, if an ordinance or resolution proposing that tax is approved by a majority vote of all the members of the city council and the tax is approved by a two-thirds vote of the qualified voters of the city voting in an election on the issue.

(b) (1) Any transactions and use tax levied under this section shall be levied pursuant to the
 Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)).

(2) The net revenues derived from a tax levied under this section shall be expended only for the provision of public safety services, as defined in Section 30052 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.91. Clovis Transactions and Use Tax [7286.48. - 7286.48.]

7286.48.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the City of Clovis may levy a transactions and use tax at a rate not to exceed 0.3 percent, if an ordinance or resolution proposing that tax is approved by a majority vote of all of the members of the city council and the tax is approved by a two-thirds vote of the qualified voters of the city voting in an election on the issue.

(b) (1) Any transactions and use tax levied under this section shall be levied pursuant to the
 Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)).

(2) The net revenues derived from a tax levied under this section shall be expended only for the provision of police and fire facilities, furnishings, and equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.92. Fort Bragg Transactions and Use Tax [7286.50. - 7286.50.]

7286.50.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the City of Fort Bragg may levy a transactions and use tax at a rate of 0.25 or 0.5 percent, if an ordinance or resolution proposing that tax is approved by a majority vote of all the members of the city council and the tax is approved by a two-thirds vote of the qualified voters of the city voting in an election on the issue.

(b) (1) Any transactions and use tax levied under this section shall be levied pursuant to the
 Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)).

(2) The net revenues derived from a tax levied under this section shall be expended only for the repair, replacement, construction, or reconstruction of the city’s streets and roads system.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2002, and as of that date is repealed. In addition, any tax imposed pursuant to this section shall cease to be operative on that date. However, any net revenues derived from that tax that remain unexpended as of that date shall be expended in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) until those net revenues are exhausted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 895, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.93. Woodland Transactions and Use Tax [7286.52. - 7286.52.]

7286.52.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the City of Woodland may levy a transactions and use tax at a rate of 0.25 percent or 0.5 percent, if an ordinance or resolution proposing that tax is approved by a two-thirds vote of all the members of the city council and the tax is approved by a majority vote of the qualified voters of the city voting in an election on the issue.

(b) Any transactions and use tax levied under this section shall be levied pursuant to the Transactions and Use
 Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)).

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 712, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.94. San Joaquin County Transactions and Use Tax [7286.55. - 7286.55.]

7286.55.

(a) In addition to the tax levied pursuant to Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), and any other tax authorized by this part, the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Joaquin may impose a transactions and use tax by adoption of an ordinance in accordance with this part if each of the following conditions are met:

(1) The ordinance imposing the tax is submitted to and approved by the voters of the county in accordance with Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 53720)
 of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(2) The tax is imposed at a rate of .125 percent for a period not to exceed 10 years.

(3) The revenues collected from the tax are used only for funding countywide library programs and operations.

(b) The Board of Supervisors of the County of San Joaquin may impose a transactions and use tax in any succeeding period not to exceed 10 years per period if all of the conditions specified in subdivision (a) are met for that succeeding period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 895, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.95. Peninsula Corridor Joint Powers Board [7286.65. - 7286.65.]

7286.65.

(a) Upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the directors of the Peninsula Corridor Joint Powers Board, a joint powers authority formed pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), the board may, by resolution and consistent with subdivision (b), submit to the voters of the Counties of San Francisco, San Mateo, and Santa Clara a regional measure proposing only a retail transactions
 and use tax, at a rate not to exceed 0.125 percent and in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of this code) and Article XIII   C of the California Constitution, with net revenues from the tax to be used by the board for the operating and capital purposes of the Caltrain rail service.

(b) The measure shall only be submitted to the voters upon approval by the boards of supervisors of the Counties of San Francisco, San Mateo, and Santa Clara, consistent with each county’s applicable procedures, and approval by the San Francisco Municipal Transportation Agency, the San Mateo County Transit District, and the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority by a majority vote of each transportation entity’s governing board.

(c) The measure shall be approved if two-thirds of all of the voters voting on the measure approve it.

(d) The board may impose a retail transactions and use tax pursuant to subdivision (a) that, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), exceeds the limit established in Section 7251.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 653, Sec. 1.   (SB 797)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.97. Placerville Transactions and Use Tax [7286.70. - 7286.70.]

7286.70.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the City of Placerville may levy a transactions and use tax at a rate of either 0.125 or 0.25 percent, if an ordinance or resolution proposing that tax is approved by a majority vote of all of the members of the city council and the tax is approved by a two-thirds vote of qualified voters of the city voting in an election on the issue.

(b) (1) Any transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be levied
 pursuant to Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251).

(2) The net revenues derived from a tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be expended only for police services, and shall be so expended in addition to, and shall not supplant, the level of funding for police services that was provided from other revenue sources by the City of Placerville for the 1997–98 fiscal year. “Police services” shall be defined in the ordinance or resolution proposing the transactions and use tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 234, Sec. 1.   Effective August 4, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.98. County Transactions and Use Tax for Library Programs [7286.59. - 7286.59.]

7286.59.

(a) In addition to the tax levied pursuant to Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), and any other tax authorized by this part, a board of supervisors of a county may impose a transactions and use tax in lieu of, and not in addition to, a tax imposed under Section 7285.5 for the purposes described in paragraph (4), by the adoption of an ordinance in accordance with
 this part if each of the following conditions are met:

(1) The ordinance imposing the tax is submitted to and approved by the voters of the county by a two-thirds vote of those voters voting on the ordinance in accordance with Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 53720) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(2) The ordinance includes an expenditure plan describing the specific purposes for which the revenues from the tax may be expended.

(3) The tax is imposed at a rate of 0.125 or 0.25 percent for a period not to exceed 16 years.

(4) The revenues collected from the tax are used only for funding public library construction, acquisition, programs, and operations within the county. These revenues shall be used only to
 supplement existing expenditures for public libraries and shall not be used to supplant existing funding for the support of public libraries.

(5) The transactions and use tax conforms to Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251).

(b) “Public library” means a library, or two or more libraries that are operated as a single entity by one or more public jurisdictions, that serve the general public and are required to report appropriations to the State Librarian under the provisions of Section 18023 of the Education Code.

(c) The board of supervisors may impose a transactions and use tax in any succeeding period not to exceed 16 years per period if all of the conditions specified in subdivision (a) are met for that succeeding period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 88, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.985. West Sacramento Transactions and Use Tax [7286.75. - 7286.75.]

7286.75.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the City of West Sacramento may levy a transactions and use tax at a rate of 0.25 percent or 0.5 percent, if an ordinance proposing that tax is approved by a two-thirds vote of all of the members of the city council and the tax is approved by either a two-thirds or a majority vote of qualified voters of the city voting in an election on the issue, as determined by the ordinance proposing the tax and establishing how the revenues derived from the tax shall be expended.

(b) Any transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be levied in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 263, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.99. Sebastopol Transactions and Use Tax [7286.80. - 7286.80.]

7286.80.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the City of Sebastopol may levy a transactions and use tax at a rate of 0.125 percent, if an ordinance or resolution proposing that tax is approved by two-thirds of all of the members of the city council and the tax is approved by a majority vote of qualified voters of the city voting in an election on the issue.

(b) (1) Any transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be levied in accordance with Part
 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251).

(2) The net revenues derived from a tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be expended for general revenue purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 292, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.995. San Mateo County Transactions and Use Tax for Parks and Recreation Purposes [7286.90. - 7286.90.]

7286.90.

(a) In addition to the tax levied pursuant to Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) and any other tax authorized by this part, the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Mateo may impose a transactions and use tax in lieu of, and not in addition to, a tax imposed under Section 7285.5 for the purposes described in paragraph (4), by the adoption of an ordinance in accordance with this part if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The ordinance imposing the tax is
 approved by a two-thirds vote of all members of the board of supervisors and is subsequently submitted to and approved by the voters of the county by a two-thirds vote of those voters voting on the ordinance in accordance with Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 53720) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(2) The ordinance includes an expenditure plan describing the purposes for which the revenues from the tax may be expended, consistent with the purposes described in paragraph (4). The plan may provide for distribution of revenues to cities and special districts within the county for implementation of the plan.

(3) The tax is imposed at a rate of 0.125 or 0.25 percent for a specified period of time.

(4) The revenues collected from the tax are used only for park and recreation
 acquisition, improvements, maintenance, programs, and operations within the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county.

(5) The transactions and use tax conforms to Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251).

(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Mateo may impose a transactions and use tax in any succeeding period if all of the conditions specified in subdivision (a) are met for that succeeding period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 682, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.12. Truckee Transactions and Use Tax [7286.60. - 7286.60.]

7286.60.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the Town of Truckee may levy a transactions and use tax at a rate of 0.5 percent, if an ordinance or resolution proposing that tax is approved by a majority vote of all the members of the town council and the tax is approved by a two-thirds vote of the qualified voters of the town voting in an election on the issue.

(b) (1) Any transactions and use tax levied under this section shall be levied pursuant to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)).

(2) The net revenues derived from a tax levied under this section shall be expended exclusively for the repair, replacement, construction, or reconstruction of the town’s streets and roads system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 889, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Graffiti Prevention Tax [7287. - 7287.10.]

7287.

(a) The legislative body of any city or county, or city and county, may levy a tax by an ordinance approved by two-thirds of the electors voting on the measure, in addition to any other tax authorized by this division, on the privilege of selling at retail within its jurisdiction aerosol paint containers, containers of any other marking substance, felt tip markers which have a flat or angled writing surface of one-half inch or greater, or any other marking instruments, at the rate of no more than ten cents ($0.10) per aerosol paint container or container of other marking substance, and no
 more than five cents ($0.05) per felt tip marker or other marking instrument.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “aerosol paint container” means any aerosol container, regardless of the material from which it is made, which is adapted or made for the purpose of spraying paint capable of defacing property.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, “felt tip marker” means any broad-tipped indelible marker or similar implement containing an ink that is not water-soluble.

(d) For purposes of this chapter, “marking substance” and “marking instrument” means any substance or instrument, other than aerosol paint containers and felt tip markers, which could be used to draw, spray, paint, or mark, including, but not limited to, shoe polish applicators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1411, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7287.2.

Any ordinance levying a tax pursuant to this chapter shall provide for the following:

(a) That the city or county, or city and county, shall contract prior to the effective date of the ordinance with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration or operation of the ordinance for as long as the city or county, or city and county, has an operative ordinance enacted pursuant to this chapter.

(b) That the ordinance is repealed no later than five years after its effective
 date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1411, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7287.4.

Every retailer engaged in business in a city or county, or city and county, which has an operative ordinance enacted pursuant to this chapter shall, at the time of making the sales of aerosol paint containers or felt tip markers, collect the tax from the consumer and give to the consumer a receipt therefor in the manner and form prescribed by the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1411, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7287.6.

All revenues collected pursuant to a tax authorized by this chapter shall be remitted to the State Board of Equalization and allocated by the board as follows:

(a) First, for reimbursement to the board, pursuant to the contract between the board and the city or county, or city and county, of the reasonable costs of administering and enforcing the ordinance on behalf of the local entity.

(b) Second, for transmission not later than March 15 of each calendar year to each city or county, or city and county, which has an operative
 ordinance enacted pursuant to this chapter, in an amount corresponding to the amount of revenues derived within that jurisdiction from a tax levied by that ordinance.

Moneys transmitted to a city or county, or city and county, pursuant to this section shall only be expended by that local entity for purposes of the removal and prevention of graffiti, or for educational programs for at-risk youth to combat graffiti vandalism in all its forms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1411, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7287.8.

The State Board of Equalization shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter, and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce, rules and regulations for those purposes pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The board may prescribe the extent to which any rule or regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1411, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7287.9.

Except as provided in Section 7287.10, to the extent feasible or practicable, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6451), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6701), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6901), and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 7051) of Part 1, shall govern determinations, collection of tax, overpayments and refunds, and administration under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1411, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7287.10.

(a) The return and payment of the tax imposed by this chapter is due and payable to the board annually on or before February 15 following the end of the calendar year during which the tax was collected.

(b) For purposes of computing interest due on any amount of tax not paid when due, interest shall be computed to the 15th day of each succeeding month.

(c) Except in the case of fraud, intent to evade this chapter or accompanying rules and regulations, or failure to make a return, every notice of a
 deficiency determination shall be mailed within three years after the 15th day of the second month following the one-year period for which the amount is proposed to be determined or within three years after the return is filed, whichever period expires later. In the case of failure to make a return, every notice of determination shall be mailed within eight years after the 15th day of the second month following the one-year period for which the amount is proposed to be determined.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no refund shall be approved by the board after three years from the 15th day of the second month following the one-year period for which the overpayment was made, or with respect to determinations made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 6481), Article 3 (commencing with Section 6511), and Article 4 (commencing with Section 6536) of Chapter 5 of Part 1, after six months from the date the
 determinations become final, or after six months from the date of overpayment, whichever period expires later, unless a claim therefor is filed with the board within that period. No credit shall be approved by the board after the expiration of that period unless a claim for credit is filed with the board within that period, or unless the credit relates to a period for which a waiver has been granted pursuant to Section 6488.

(2) A refund may be approved by the board for any period for which a waiver has been granted under Section 6488 if a claim for refund is filed with the board before the expiration of the waiver period.

(e) In all other instances where the due date specified in subdivision (a) conflicts with a due date specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6451), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6701), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6901), and Chapter 8
 (commencing with Section 7051) of Part 1, the due date specified in subdivision (a) shall be substituted for any due date specified in those chapters, and periods running from or to, or otherwise based on, the otherwise applicable due date shall be adjusted accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1411, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.10. City of Victorville Transactions and Use Tax [7287.11. - 7287.12.]

7287.11.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Victorville, by ordinance or by citizens’ initiative, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 1 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1 if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of the City of Victorville adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and
 use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 961, Sec. 1.   (AB 2443)   Effective September 29, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7287.12.)
-------------------------------------------

7287.12.

If, as of January 1, 2029, an ordinance or citizens’ initiative proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved as required by Section 7287.11, this chapter shall be repealed as of that same date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 961, Sec. 1.   (AB 2443)   Effective September 29, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.10, commencing with Section 7287.11.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.11. City of Lancaster Transactions and Use Tax [7287.13. - 7287.14.]

7287.13.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Lancaster, by ordinance or by citizens’ initiative, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 1 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1 if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of the City of Lancaster adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use
 tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 961, Sec. 2.   (AB 2443)   Effective September 29, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7287.14.)
-------------------------------------------

7287.14.

If, as of January 1, 2029, an ordinance or citizens’ initiative proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved as required by Section 7287.13, this chapter shall be repealed as of that same date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 961, Sec. 2.   (AB 2443)   Effective September 29, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.11, commencing with Section 7287.13.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.12. City of Palmdale Transactions and Use Tax [7287.15. - 7287.16.]

7287.15.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Palmdale, by ordinance or by citizens’ initiative, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 1 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1 if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of the City of Palmdale adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions
 and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting
 on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 961, Sec. 3.   (AB 2443)   Effective September 29, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7287.16.)
-------------------------------------------

7287.16.

If, as of January 1, 2029, an ordinance or citizens’ initiative proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved as required by Section 7287.15, this chapter shall be repealed as of that same date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 961, Sec. 3.   (AB 2443)   Effective September 29, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.12, commencing with Section 7287.15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.13. City of Hercules Transactions and Use Tax [7287.17. - 7287.17.]

7287.17.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Hercules, by ordinance, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 1 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of the City of Hercules adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to
 the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.
